src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! !!!Verb inflection

LEXICON V_
+WORK: # ;

!! !!ONE-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL VOWEL
LEXICON IV_Е !!≈ * __@CODE@__ есь:е
+V+IV: V-01_Е ;

LEXICON IV_МЭ
+V+IV: V-01_МЭ       ;

LEXICON TV_МЭ
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_МЭ       ;

LEXICON IV_МЫ
+V+IV: V-01_МЫ       ;

LEXICON TV_МЫ
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_МЫ       ;

LEXICON VA_НЁ
+V+Aux: V-01_НЁ       ;

LEXICON VA_НИ
+V+Aux: V-01_НИ       ;

LEXICON IV_НИ
+V+IV: V-01_НИ       ;

LEXICON IV_НО
+V+IV: V-01_НО       ;

LEXICON IV_НУ
!+V+IV: V-01_НУ       ;
+V+IV: V-NEW_ХО       ;

LEXICON IV_НУ-Pal/Var
+V+IV: V-01_НУ       ;
+V+IV: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON VR_НУ
+V+Refl: V-01_НУ-REFL       ;

LEXICON VR_НУ-Pal/Var
+V+Refl: V-01_НУ-REFL       ;
+V+IV: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON TV_НУ
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_НУ       ;

LEXICON TV_НУ-Pal/Var
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_НУ       ;
+V+TV: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON IV_НУ/ТУ
+V+IV: V-01_НУ/ТУ       ;

LEXICON IV_ӇЭ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ӈэсь:ӈэ
+V+IV: V-01_ӇЭ       ;

LEXICON IV_ӇЭ-Pal/Var
+V+IV: V-01_ӇЭ       ;
+V+IV: PRC_PALVAR ;

!!LEXICON IV_ТО !!the same as IV_ТУ
!!+V+IV: V-01_ТО       ;

LEXICON IV_ТУ
+V+IV: V-01_ТУ       ;

LEXICON TV_ТУ
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ТУ       ;

LEXICON IV_ХО
!+V+IV: V-01_ХО  ;
+V+IV: V-NEW_ХО  ;


LEXICON TV_ХО
!+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ХО       ;
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-NEW_ХО       ;

LEXICON VR_ХО-Pal/Var
!+V+Refl: V-01_ИЛЕ-REFL  ; verbs still need dealing with
+V+Refl: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON IV_ХЭ
+V+IV: V-01_ХЭ       ;

!! !!TWO-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL VOWEL
LEXICON IV_НАМДА !!≈ * __@CODE@__ намдась:намда
+V+IV: V-NEW_НАМДА ;

LEXICON TV_НАМДА
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-NEW_НАМДА ;

LEXICON VR_НАМДА
V-NEW_НАМДА ;

LEXICON IV_ВАДЮ
+V+IV: V-01_ВАДЮ       ;

LEXICON TV_ВАДЮ
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ВАДЮ       ;

LEXICON IV_ЯКУ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ якась:яка
+V+IV: V-01_ЯКУ       ;

LEXICON IV_ИЛЕ
+V+IV: V-01_ИЛЕ	;

LEXICON IV_ИЛЕ-Pal/Var ! Work needed for variation 2013-03-04
+V+IV: V-01_ИЛЕ ;
+V+IV: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON VR_ИЛЕ
+V+Refl: V-01_ИЛЕ-REFL	;

LEXICON VR_ИЛЕ-Pal/Var ! Work needed for variation 2013-09-05
+V+Refl: V-01_ИЛЕ-REFL  ;
+V+Refl: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON TV_ИЛЕ
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ИЛЕ	;

LEXICON IV_НЕНЫ
+V+IV: V-01_НЕНЫ       ;

LEXICON IV_ӇЭСУ
+V+IV: V-01_ӇЭСУ       ;

LEXICON TV_ӇЭСУ
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ӇЭСУ       ;

LEXICON IV_ПЭБЮ
+V+IV: V-01_ПЭБЮ       ;

LEXICON IV_ПЭБЮ-Pal/Var
+V+IV: V-01_ПЭБЮ       ;
+V+IV: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON TV_ПЭБЮ
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ПЭБЮ       ;

!LEXICON VR_ПЭБЮ
!+V+Refl: V-01_ПЭБЮ-REFL ;

LEXICON IV_ХАДА !!≈ * __@CODE@__ хадась:хада
!+V+IV: V-01_ХАДА       ;
+V+IV: V-NEW_ХАДА       ;

LEXICON TV_ХАДА !!≈ * __@CODE@__ хадась:хада
!+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ХАДА       ;
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-NEW_ХАДА       ;

LEXICON VR_ХАДА
!+V+Refl: V-01_ХАДА-REFL ;
+V+Refl: V-NEW_ХАДА-REFL ;

LEXICON IV_ЮХУ
+V+IV: V-01_ЮХУ       ;

LEXICON TV_ЮХУ
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ЮХУ       ;


!! !THREE-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL VOWEL
LEXICON IV_ЛАХАНА
+V+IV: V-01_ЛАХАНА       ;

LEXICON IV_ЛАХАНА-Pal/Var
+V+IV: V-01_ЛАХАНА       ;
+V+IV: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON VR_ЛАХАНА
+V+Refl: V-01_ЛАХАНА-REFL       ;

LEXICON TV_ЛАХАНА
!+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ЛАХАНА       ;
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-NEW_ЛАХАНА       ; !!= * __@CODE@__ 3-syll

LEXICON TV_ЛАХАНА-Pal/Var
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ЛАХАНА       ;
+V+TV: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON IV_ӇЭДАРА
+V+IV: V-NEW_ӇЭДАРА ;
LEXICON TV_ӇЭДАРА
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-NEW_ӇЭДАРА ;
LEXICON VR_ӇЭДАРА
+V+Refl: V-NEW_ӇЭДАРА-REFL ;

LEXICON IV_СЯНАКУ
+V+IV: V-01_СЯНАКУ       ;

LEXICON IV_ЯˮАВЛУ
!! * Yaml: __V-yaqwlasj__
+V+IV: V-01_ЯˮАВЛУ      ;

LEXICON IV_ЯˮАВЛУ-Pal/Var
+V+IV: V-01_ЯˮАВЛУ	; ! more work to be done with -Pal/Var 2013-03-04
+V+IV: PRC_PALVAR ;

!LEXICON VR_ЯˮАВЛУ
!+V+Refl: V-01_ЯˮАВЛУ-REFL      ;

LEXICON TV_ЯˮАВЛУ
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ЯˮАВЛУ      ;

!! !ONE-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL CONSONANT
LEXICON IV_МАН  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ манзь:маН1
!! * Yaml: __manzj__
+V+IV: V-01_МАН       ;

LEXICON IV_МИН
+V+IV: V-01_МИН       ;

LEXICON IV_МИН-Pal/Var
+V+IV: V-01_МИН       ;
+V+IV: PRC_PALVAR2 ;

LEXICON TV_МИН
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_МИН       ;

LEXICON VR_МИН
+V+Refl: V-01_МИН-REFL ;

LEXICON IV_САС
+V+IV: V-01_САС       ;

LEXICON VR_САС
+V+Refl: V-01_САС-REFL       ;

LEXICON TV_САС !!= * @CODE@ манэць:манэ
!!= * Yaml: __V-manecj__
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_САС       ;

LEXICON TV_САС-Pal/Var
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_САС       ;
+V+TV: PRC_PALVAR2 ;

LEXICON IV_ТИР
+V+IV: V-01_ТИР       ;

LEXICON IV_ТИР-Pal/Var
+V+IV: V-01_ТИР       ;
+V+IV: PRC_PALVAR2 ;

LEXICON VR_ТИР
+V+Refl: V-01_ТИР-REFL       ;

LEXICON TV_ТИР
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ТИР       ;

LEXICON TV_ТИР-Pal/Var
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ТИР       ;
+V+TV: PRC_PALVAR2 ;

!! !TWO-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL CONSONANT
LEXICON IV_НЭКАЛ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
+V+IV: V-01_НЭКАЛ       ;

LEXICON TV_НЭКАЛ
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_НЭКАЛ       ;

LEXICON IV_ӇАДИМ/ӇАРАМ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 2013-12-16
+V+IV: V-01_ӇАДИМ       ;
+V+IV: V-01_ӇАРАМ       ;


LEXICON IV_ӇАДИМ-Pal/Var
+V+IV: V-01_ӇАДИМ       ;
+V+IV: PRC_PALVAR2 ;

LEXICON IV_ӇАДИМ
+V+IV: V-01_ӇАДИМ       ;

LEXICON VR_ӇАРАМ
+V+Refl: V-01_ӇАРАМ-REFL	;

LEXICON IV_ӇАРАМ
+V+IV: V-01_ӇАРАМ       ;

LEXICON TV_ӇАРАМ
+V+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ӇАРАМ	;



!! !!AFTER +TV, +IV, +Aux, +Refl
!! Not yet written.

!! !!CONJUGATION BY STEM TYPE

!! !ONE-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL VOWEL

LEXICON V-01_Е
+Ind@R.CONJ.ObjAll@:0@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_IND-4-AOR-OC ;
+Ind@R.CONJ.ObjAll@:0@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_IND-4-PRT1-OC ;
 V_PREC ;
 V_Hort ;
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_Hort-Obj ;
 V_Imprt-Scsg2 ;
 V_Imprt ;
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_Imprt-Obj ;
 V_Opt ;
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_Opt-Obj ;
 V_Subord ;
 V_AUD ;
 V_Conj ;
 V_Mod/appr ;
 V_Mod/des ;
 V_Mod/futappr ;
 V_Mod/hyp ;
 V_Mod/int ;
 V_Mod/narr ;
 V_Mod/narrPrt ;
 V_Mod/nec ;
 V_Mod/perfprob ;
 V_Mod/prob ;
 V_Mod/perfappr ;
 V_Mod/obl ;
 V_Mod/rep ;
 V_Mod/sup ;
 IND-AOR		;
 IND-AOR-SG3 	;
 IND-AOR-DU3 	;
+Ind: IND-4-PRT1-DU3 ;
+Ind: IND-4-PRT1		;
 PRC ;
 PRC-IMPRF ;
 PRC-FUT ;
 PRC-NEG ; !!= * @CODE@	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
 CONNEG ;

LEXICON V-01_МЭ
+Ind@R.CONJ.ObjAll@:0@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_IND-4-AOR-OC-WITH-OCDU3-IN_ӇА ;
+Ind@R.CONJ.ObjAll@:0@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_IND-4-PRT1-OC ;
 V_PREC ;
 V_Hort ;
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_Hort-Obj ;
 V_Imprt-Scsg2 ;
 V_Imprt ;
 V_Opt ;
 V_Subord ;
 V_AUD ;
 V_Conj ;
 V_HAB ;
 V_Fut_ӇГУ ;
 V_Mod/appr ;
 V_Mod/des ;
 V_Mod/futappr ;
 V_Mod/hyp ;
 V_Mod/int ;
 V_Mod/narr ;
 V_Mod/narrPrt ;
 V_Mod/nec ;
 V_Mod/perfprob ;
 V_Mod/prob ;
 V_Mod/perfappr ;
 V_Mod/obl ;
 V_Mod/rep ;
 V_Mod/sup ;
 IND-AOR		;
 IND-AOR-SG3 	;
:%>ӈа IND-AOR-DU3 	;
+Ind: IND-4-PRT1-DU3 ;
+Ind: IND-4-PRT1		;
 PRC ;
 PRC-IMPRF ;
 PRC-FUT ;
 PRC-NEG ; !!= * @CODE@	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
:%^VowRaise PRC-NEG ; !!= * @CODE@	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
:%^VowRaise CONNEG ;


LEXICON V-01_МЫ
+Ind@R.CONJ.ObjAll@:0@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_IND-4-AOR-OC ;
+Ind@R.CONJ.ObjAll@:0@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_IND-4-PRT1-OC ;
 V_PREC ;
 V_Hort ;
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_Hort-Obj ;
 V_Imprt-Scsg2 ;
 V_Imprt ;
 V_Opt ;
 V_Subord ;
 V_AUD ;
 V_Conj ;
 V_HAB ;
 V_Fut_ӇГУ ;
 V_Mod/appr ;
 V_Mod/des ;
 V_Mod/futappr ;
 V_Mod/hyp ;
 V_Mod/int ;
 V_Mod/narr ;
 V_Mod/narrPrt ;
 V_Mod/nec ;
 V_Mod/perfprob ;
 V_Mod/prob ;
 V_Mod/perfappr ;
 V_Mod/obl ;
 V_Mod/rep ;
 V_Mod/sup ;
 IND-AOR		;
 IND-AOR-SG3 	;
 IND-AOR-DU3 	;
+Ind: IND-4-PRT1-DU3 ;
+Ind: IND-4-PRT1		;
 PRC ;
 PRC-IMPRF ;
 PRC-FUT ;
 PRC-NEG ; !!= * @CODE@	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
:%^VowRaise PRC-NEG ; !!= * @CODE@	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
:%^VowRaise CONNEG ;
